ro-RO: Tipul de concentrație: Concentrat - uz intens; Concentrat - uz ușor; Gata de utilizare (RTU); Necesită diluare (raportul variază); Super concentrat; Altele
pl: Typ stężenia: Koncentrat – do silnych zabrudzeń; Koncentrat – do lekkich zabrudzeń; Gotowy do użycia (RTU); Wymaga rozcieńczenia (różne proporcje); Superkoncentrat; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de concentração: Concentrado - uso intensivo; Concentrado - uso ligeiro; Pronto a usar (RTU); Requer diluição (o rácio varia); Superconcentrado; Outro
sk-SK: Typ koncentrácie: Koncentrát – silné znečistenie; Koncentrát – bežné znečistenie; Pripravené na použitie (RTU); Vyžaduje sa riedenie (pomer sa líši); Superkoncentrát; Iné
zh-CN: 浓度类型: 浓缩 - 重度清洁; 浓缩 - 轻度清洁; 即用型 (RTU); 需要稀释（比例不一）; 超浓缩; 其他
nl: Concentratietype: Concentraat - intensief gebruik; Concentraat - licht gebruik; Gebruiksklaar (RTU); Moet worden verdund (verhouding varieert); Superconcentraat; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta koncentracije: Koncentrat – za zahtevno čiščenje; Koncentrat – za lažje čiščenje; Pripravljeno za uporabo (RTU); Potrebno redčenje (razmerje se razlikuje); Super koncentrat; Drugo
fi: Tiivistetyyppi: Tiiviste – tehokäyttö; Tiiviste – kevytkäyttö; Käyttövalmis (RTU); Vaatii laimennuksen (suhde vaihtelee); Supertiiviste; Muu
cs: Typ koncentrace: Koncentrát – pro silné znečištění; Koncentrát – pro běžné použití; K okamžitému použití (RTU); Vyžaduje naředění (poměr se liší); Superkoncentrát; Jiné
es: Tipo de concentración: Concentrado - uso intensivo; Concentrado - uso ligero; Listo para usar (RTU); Requiere dilución (la proporción varía); Superconcentrado; Otro
ja: コンセントレートタイプ: 濃縮 - 頑固な汚れ用; 濃縮 - 軽い汚れ用; そのまま使える (RTU); 希釈が必要 (希釈率は異なる); 超濃縮; その他
nb: Konsentrasjonstype: Konsentrat – ekstra kraftig; Konsentrat – lett bruk; Klar til bruk (RTU); Krever fortynning (forholdet varierer); Superkonsentrat; Annet
vi: Loại nồng độ: Đậm đặc - tẩy rửa mạnh; Đậm đặc - tẩy rửa nhẹ; Sẵn sàng sử dụng (RTU); Cần pha loãng (tỉ lệ thay đổi); Siêu đậm đặc; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta koncentrata: Koncentrat – za teške uvjete; Koncentrat – za lake uvjete; Spremno za upotrebu (RTU); Potrebno razrijediti (omjer varira); Super koncentrat; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип концентрация: Концентрат – за силно замърсяване; Концентрат – за леко замърсяване; Готов за употреба (RTU); Изисква разреждане (съотношението варира); Суперконцентрат; Друг
el: Τύπος συγκέντρωσης: Συμπύκνωμα - βαρέως τύπου; Συμπύκνωμα - ελαφρού τύπου; Έτοιμο για χρήση (RTU); Απαιτεί αραίωση (η αναλογία ποικίλλει); Υπερσυμπύκνωμα; Άλλο
de: Art des Konzentrats: Konzentrat – starke Beanspruchung; Konzentrat – leichte Beanspruchung; Gebrauchsfertig (RTU); Muss verdünnt werden (Verhältnis variiert); Superkonzentrat; Sonstige
sv: Koncentrationstyp: Koncentrat – grov; Koncentrat – mild; Färdig att använda (RTU); Kräver spädning (varierande proportioner); Superkoncentrat; Annan
hu: Koncentráció típusa: Koncentrátum – erős igénybevételre; Koncentrátum – enyhe igénybevételre; Használatra kész (RTU); Hígítást igényel (változó arány); Szuperkoncentrátum; Egyéb
en: Concentration type: Concentrate - heavy duty; Concentrate - light duty; Ready-to-use (RTU); Requires dilution (ratio varies); Super concentrate; Other
zh-TW: 濃度類型: 濃縮 - 重效型; 濃縮 - 輕效型; 即用型 (RTU); 需要稀釋 (比例不一); 超濃縮; 其他
da: Koncentrationstype: Koncentrat – ekstra kraftig; Koncentrat – let; Klar til brug (RTU); Kræver fortynding (forholdet varierer); Superkoncentrat; Andet
it: Tipo di concentrazione: Concentrato - uso intensivo; Concentrato - uso leggero; Pronto all’uso (RTU); Richiede diluizione (rapporto variabile); Super concentrato; Altro
th: ประเภทความเข้มข้น: สูตรเข้มข้น - งานหนัก; สูตรเข้มข้น - งานเบา; พร้อมใช้งาน (RTU); ต้องเจือจาง (อัตราส่วนแตกต่างกันไป); สูตรเข้มข้นพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de concentration: Concentré - usage intensif; Concentré - usage léger; Prêt à l'emploi; Nécessite une dilution (ratio variable); Super concentré; Autre
ru: Тип концентрации: Концентрат (сильнодействующий); Концентрат (мягкого действия); Готов к использованию (RTU); Требует разбавления (пропорция варьируется); Суперконцентрат; Другое
tr: Konsantre tipi: Konsantre - ağır hizmet tipi; Konsantre - hafif hizmet tipi; Kullanıma hazır (RTU); Seyreltme gerektirir (oran değişiklik gösterir); Süper konsantre; Diğer
ko: 농도 유형: 농축액 - 강력; 농축액 - 일반; 즉시 사용 가능(RTU); 희석 필요(비율 다양함); 고농축액; 기타
lt-LT: Koncentracijos tipas: Koncentratas (stipraus poveikio); Koncentratas (silpno poveikio); Paruoštas naudoti (RTU); Reikia skiesti (santykis skiriasi); Superkoncentratas; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de concentração: Concentrado - uso pesado; Concentrado - uso leve; Pronto para uso (RTU); Requer diluição (a proporção varia); Superconcentrado; Outro